North Carolina statutes. Chapter 32C. North Carolina Uniform Power of Attorney Act.
Article 4. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 32C-4-401.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this Chapter, consideration may be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among the states that enact it.

History.

2017-153, s. 1.

§ 32C-4-402.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

The provisions of this Chapter governing the legal effect, validity, or enforceability of electronic records or electronic signatures, and of contracts formed or performed with the use of those records or signatures, conform to the requirements of Section 102 of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. § 7002) and supersede, modify, and limit the requirements of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

History.

2017-153, s. 1.

§ 32C-4-403.
Effect on existing powers of attorney.

Except as otherwise provided in this Chapter, the following apply on January 1, 2018.

This Chapter applies to a power of attorney created before, on, or after January 1, 2018, unless there is clear indication of a contrary intent in the terms of a power of attorney or unless application of a particular provision of this Chapter would substantially impair rights of a party.

This Chapter applies to a judicial proceeding concerning a power of attorney commenced on or after January 1, 2018.

This Chapter applies to a judicial proceeding concerning a power of attorney commenced before January 1, 2018, unless the court finds that application of a provision of this Chapter would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceeding or prejudice the rights of a party, in which case that the particular provision of this Chapter does not apply and the superseded law applies.

A rule of construction or presumption provided by this Chapter, including the rule of

G.S. 32C-1-104

regarding durability of a power of attorney, applies to powers of attorney executed before January 1, 2018, unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent in the terms of a power of attorney or unless the application of the rule of construction or presumption would substantially impair rights of a party created under North Carolina law in effect prior to January 1, 2018, in which case the rule of construction or presumption does not apply and the superseded rule of construction or presumption applies.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or banned upon the expiration of a prescribed period that commenced under law of this State other than this Chapter before January 1, 2018, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

References to prior statutes in powers of attorney, whether executed on or after the adoption of this Chapter shall be deemed to refer to the corresponding provisions this Chapter unless application of the rule of construction would substantially impair substantial rights of a party.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this Chapter, the powers conferred by former G.S. 32A-2 shall apply to a Statutory Short Form Power of Attorney that was created in accordance with former

G.S. 32A-1

prior to January 1, 2018.

History.

2017-153, s. 1; 2018-142, s. 33.